Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 1. Generally

§ 41-6-101.
Authority to cooperate.

Whenever two (2) or more incorporated irrigation or drainage districts desire to cooperate in the operation and maintenance of their respective systems of irrigation or drainage works, they may do so by availing themselves of the provisions of this act [§§

41-6-101

through

41-6-127

], as hereinafter more particularly provided.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-1001; C.S. 1945, § 71-1901; W.S. 1957, § 41-230.

§ 41-6-102.
Election upon request of landowners; procedure generally.

The commissioners of any such district may, and, upon written request of not less than ten (10) landowners thereof, shall, at any time, submit to the qualified electors thereof the question as to whether or not they desire their district to cooperate with any other district or districts named, in the operation and maintenance of their respective systems under the provisions of this act [§§

41-6-101

through

41-6-127

]. Such question may be submitted at any general district election, or at a special election duly called for the purpose, notice of which shall have been given as required by law in case of general elections in irrigation districts. In every case, the notice of election shall state briefly but clearly the question to be submitted, naming the district or districts with which it is proposed to cooperate. The vote shall be by ballot, and a majority of the votes cast shall determine the question. If more than two (2) districts are involved in the proposal, the electors shall in like manner determine the district or districts, if any, with which they desire their district to cooperate, in the event that they do not desire to cooperate with all the districts named in the proposal, or in the event that any district or districts named in the proposal should vote adversely thereto. All elections held hereunder shall be conducted in the same manner as general irrigation district elections are required by law to be conducted.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-1002; C.S. 1945, § 71-1902; W.S. 1957, § 231.

§ 41-6-103.
Certificate of election proceedings to be filed; effect of filing; effect of informal certificates on validity of election.

Whenever any two (2) or more irrigation or drainage districts shall have voted to cooperate with one another under the provisions of this act [§§

41-6-101

through

41-6-127

], the respective commissioners thereof shall file in the office of the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of the district proceedings, a certified copy of the minutes of the election proceedings, including a copy of the election notice. From and after the filing of such certificates, the operation and maintenance of the respective irrigation or drainage, or irrigation and drainage works of said districts shall be under the exclusive management and control of a board of district managers, as hereinafter particularly provided. No informality in these certificates, or in the records of which they are a copy, shall affect the validity of any such election, if in fact the same was held in substantial compliance with this act.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 122-1003; C.S. 1945, § 71-1903; W.S. 1957, § 41-232.

§ 41-6-104.
Appeals.

Any district aggrieved by any order of apportionment of operation and maintenance costs, or any part thereof, may obtain judicial review as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] and the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 122-1012; C.S. 1945, § 71-1912; W.S. 1957, § 41-233; Laws 1985, ch. 191, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appeal from county commissioners on disallowance of claims, see §

18-3-513

et seq.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 41-6-105.
Withdrawal from joint operations.

The commissioners of any district belonging to any association formed hereunder [§§

41-6-101

through

41-6-127

], may at any time submit to the qualified electors of their district the question as to whether or not the district shall withdraw from such association. Such election shall be held as above provided, and if in any case, the vote shall be in favor of withdrawal, the result thereof shall be duly certified to the proper court, and notice thereof served upon the other districts involved. Thereupon such withdrawal will become operative on the first day of the second December following such election, and thereafter the provisions of this act shall be applicable to such district.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 161, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 122-1013; C.S. 1945, § 71-1913; W.S. 1957, § 41-234.